Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE C. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES AND OVERSIGHT COMMITTEES

CHAPTER 326. COOPERATION BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES

Sec. 326.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "legislative agency":

(1) means:

(A) the senate;

(B) the house of representatives;

(C) a committee, division, department, or office of the senate or house;

(D) the Texas Legislative Council;

(E) the Legislative Budget Board;

(F) the Legislative Reference Library;

(G) the office of the State Auditor; or

(H) any other agency in the legislative branch of state government; and

(2) does not include the Texas Ethics Commission.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 2.15(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 326.002. PROVISION OF SERVICES. (a) A legislative agency may provide administrative, professional, clerical, data processing, and other services to another legislative agency with or without reimbursement and may transfer equipment, supplies, and materials to the other legislative agency with or without reimbursement.

(b) Reimbursement, if any, must be made under a written contract executed by an officer who is authorized to execute contracts for each agency.

(c) The Texas Legislative Council may transfer money to another legislative agency to cover expenses of the other agency that the executive director of the council determines to be necessary to further a purpose of the council.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 2.15(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 326.003. COMMITTEE OF STATE AUDITOR'S OFFICE, LEGISLATIVE BUDGET BOARD, AND SUNSET ADVISORY COMMISSION. (a) The State Auditor's Office, Legislative Budget Board, and Sunset Advisory Commission shall form a committee to make recommendations relating to the coordination of the agencies' functions.

(b) The committee shall meet on a regular basis at least quarterly. The State Auditor shall call each meeting.

(c) Each agency shall designate a supervisory level staff member as its representative on the committee.

(d) Not later than one month after the date of a meeting, the committee shall submit its recommendations in writing to the head of each agency and the members of the legislative audit committee.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 2.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.